Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2632.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2006-B(a)(1) introductory paragraph, (i) and (ii) and (2) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, amended November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324 Section 2006-B. Limitations.(a) Amount.--(1) [The] For fiscal years prior to the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved for contributions from business firms to scholarship organizations, educational improvement organizations and pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations shall not exceed $590,000,000 in a fiscal year. The following shall apply:(i) No less than [$375,000,000] $303,000,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from business firms to scholarship organizations.(ii) No less than [$74,500,000] $146,500,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from business firms to educational improvement organizations.* * *(2) [The] For fiscal years prior to the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved for contributions from business firms to opportunity scholarship organizations shall not exceed $90,000,000 in a fiscal year.(3) No tax credit may be approved under this article for the 2027-2028 fiscal year or a fiscal year thereafter.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2014-B. Termination of authority.(a) Applications.--The department may not accept an application for a tax credit under this article for the 2027-2028 fiscal year or a fiscal year thereafter.20260HB2632PN3651 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Approval.--The department may not approve a tax credit under this article for the 2027-2028 fiscal year or a fiscal year thereafter.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the validity, use, administration, reporting, review, enforcement or recapture of a tax credit approved under this article for a fiscal year prior to the 2027-2028 fiscal year.Section 3. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XX-B.1EDUCATION OPTIONS TAX CREDITSSection 2001-B.1. Scope of article.This article relates to education options tax credits.Section 2002-B.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Accountability for Diverted Tax Dollars Restricted Account established under section 2003-B.1(f)."Applicable tax." Any of the taxes due under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XV or XX of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 or a tax under Article XVI of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Applicant." An eligible early childhood student or eligible student who applies for a scholarship."Assessment." The Pennsylvania System of School Assessment test, the Keystone Exam, an equivalent local assessment or another test established or approved by the State Board of Education or the General Assembly to meet the requirements of section 2603-B(d)(10)(i), or required under the Every Student 20260HB2632PN3651 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802) or its successor statute or another test required to achieve other standards established by the Department of Education for the public school or school district under 22 Pa. Code § 403.3 (relating to single accountability system)."Attendance boundary." A geographic area of residen ce used by a school district to assign a student to a public school . "Average daily membership." As defined in section 2501(3) . "Business firm." An entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and subject to taxes imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XV or XX of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 or a tax under Article XVI of The Insurance Company Law of 1921. The term does not include a pass-through entity the purpose of which is making contributions under this article."Career and technical school." A public secondary school established under Article XVIII."Contribution." A donation of cash, personal property or services, the value of which is the net cost of the donation to the donor or the pro rata hourly wage, including benefits, of the individual performing the services."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Early childhood program." An early learning and development program for children under six years of age, including any of the following:(1) A child care center as defined under 55 Pa. Code § 3270.4 (relating to definitions).(2) A group child care home as defined under 55 Pa. Code § 3280.4 (relating to definitions).(3) A family child care home as defined under 55 Pa. 20260HB2632PN3651 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Code § 3290.4 (relating to definitions).(4) A program of instruction for three-year-old, four-year-old, five-year-old or six-year-old students, other than kindergarten, that uses a curriculum aligned with the curriculum of the school with which it is affiliated and provides any of the following:(i) A minimum of two hours of instructional and developmental activities per day for at least 60 days per school year.(ii) A minimum of two hours of instructional and developmental activities per day for at least 20 days over the summer recess."Early childhood scholarship program." A program that provides scholarships to eligible early childhood students to attend an early childhood program operating within this Commonwealth. The term includes a program that has an application and review process for making awards to eligible early childhood students and awards scholarships to eligible early childhood students without limiting availability to students of one school or one building within a school district or nonpublic school."Early childhood student." An individual who meets all of the following:(1) Is younger than compulsory school age as defined in section 1326.(2) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(3) Attends an early childhood program."Economically disadvantaged scholarship program." A program that provides scholarships to eligible students who meet any of the following:20260HB2632PN3651 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Reside within the attendance boundary of a low-achieving school. (2) Attend a school that is on the list published by the Department of Education under section 2003-B.1(b)(3)."Educational improvement program." An advanced academic or similar program that is operated by or in conjunction with a public school, including a chartered school as defined in section 1376.1, a private school approved under section 1376 or an intermediate unit, is not part of the regular academic program of the school and enhances the curriculum or academic program of the school. The term includes a program or activity that otherwise meets this definition and has any of the following characteristics:(1) Integrates with the instructional program of the school.(2) Supplements, reconstructs or involves a major revision to the curriculum or academic program of the school.(3) Provides a different focus, delivery, methodology or skill training than is provided in a typical academic program of the school, including Internet-based and distance learning technologies.(4) Is offered separately from the school curriculum or academic program.(5) Is offered before or after school hours, on weekends, as a year-round program or as an extension of the school year.(6) Is offered as a standards-based program of instruction that operates outside of the length and time requirements of the school but meets the minimum hours or days of instruction required by State law.20260HB2632PN3651 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Uses specialized instructional materials, instructors or instruction not provided by the school.(8) Uses internships and other work-based learning opportunities for a student that supplement the student's curriculum or academic program and provide the student with the opportunity to apply the knowledge and skills learned in the academic program.(9) Offers instruction or programming that provides credits or advanced placement at a two-year or four-year college or university authorized by the Department of Education.(10) Reconfigures, renovates or equips a facility owned by a public school to create a specialized environment that is integral and necessary to the operation of an educational improvement program.(11) Offers a career and technical education program or another occupational-oriented program approved by the Secretary of Education.(12) Provides special education programs or services.(13) Has any other similar characteristic approved by the Secretary of Education."Elementary school." A school that is not a secondary school."Eligible contributor." A business firm or pass-through entity."Eligible early childhood student." An early childhood student, including an eligible student with a disability, who is enrolled in an early childhood program and is a member of a household with a household income of not more than the maximum annual household income.20260HB2632PN3651 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Eligible nonprofit entity." An organization that is exempt from Federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) and located in this Commonwealth."Eligible student." A school-age student, including an eligible student with a disability, who is enrolled in a school and is a member of a household with a household income of not more than the maximum annual household income."Eligible student with a disability." An early childhood student or school-age student who meets all of the following:(1) Has been identified, in accordance with 22 Pa. Code Ch. 14 (relating to special education services and programs), as a child with a disability as defined in 34 CFR 300.8 (relating to child with a disability).(2) Needs special education and related services.(3) Is enrolled in an early childhood program or in a schoo l. (4) Is a member of a household with a household income of not more than the maximum annual household income."Family member." A parent, stepparent, child, stepchild, spouse, domestic partner, brother, sister, stepbrother or stepsister."Fiscal year." The Commonwealth's fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30."Household." An individual living alone or with any of the following:(1) A spouse.(2) A parent and the parent's unemancipated minor children.(3) Other unemancipated minor children who are related 20260HB2632PN3651 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by blood or marriage.(4) Other adults or unemancipated minor children living in the household who are dependent upon the individual."Household income." All money or property received of whatever nature and from whatever source derived. The term does not include any of the following:(1) Periodic payments for sickness and disability other than regular wages received during a period of sickness or disability.(2) Disability, retirement or other payments arising under workers' compensation acts, occupational disease acts and similar legislation by any government.(3) Payments commonly recognized as old-age or retirement benefits paid to an individual retired from service after reaching a specific age or after a stated period of employment.(4) Payments commonly known as public assistance or unemployment compensation payments by a governmental agency.(5) Payments to reimburse actual expenses.(6) Payments made by employers or labor unions for programs covering hospitalization, sickness, disability or death, supplemental unemployment benefits, strike benefits, Social Security or retirement.(7) Compensation received by United States servicemen serving in a combat zone.(8) Payments received from a governmental agency to relieve the economic effects of the COVID-19 pandemic."Kindergarten." A one-year formal educational program that occurs during the school year immediately prior to first grade. The term includes a part-time and full-time program.20260HB2632PN3651 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Low-achieving school." A public school that ranked in the lowest 15% of the school's designation as an elementary school or a secondary school based on combined mathematics and reading scores from the assessment administered in any of the previous five school years and for which the Department of Education has posted results on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website. The term does not include a charter school, cyber charter school or career and technical school."Maximum annual household income." The amount calculated as follows:(1) Subject to adjustment under paragraphs (2), (3) and (4), $120,000.(2) For each eligible student and , eligible early childhood student AND DEPENDENT MEMBER OF THE HOUSEHOLD , the amount under paragraph (1) plus 10% of the amount under paragraph (1).(3) For each eligible student with a disability, the amount calculated by multiplying the applicable amount under paragraph (1) by 1.5.(4) Beginning July 1, 2029, the department shall annually adjust the income amount under paragraph (1) by the percentage change in the minimum wage under the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, from the preceding calendar year."Nonpublic school." A nonprofit school, other than a public school, in which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements under this act and which meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 et seq.).20260HB2632PN3651 - 10 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Parent." An individual who is a resident of this Commonwealth and meets any of the following:(1) Has legal custody or guardianship of a student.(2) Keeps a student in the individual's home and supports the student gratis as if the student were a lineal descendant of the individual."Participating nonpublic school." A nonpublic school that is eligible under section 2011-B.1 to accept recipients."Participating public school." A public school in a school district that is eligible under section 2011-B.1 to accept recipients. The term does not include a low-achieving school."Pass-through entity." A partnership as defined in section 301(n.0) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971, a single-member limited liability company treated as a disregarded entity for Federal income tax purposes or a Pennsylvania S corporation as defined in section 301(n.1) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. The term includes a pass-through entity that owns an interest in a pass-through entity. The term includes a qualified Subchapter S trust. The term includes a pass-through entity the purpose of which is making contributions under this article and whose shareholders, partners or members are composed of owners or employees of business firms."Public school." A public prekindergarten at which compulsory attendance requirements do not apply or a public kindergarten, elementary school, secondary school or career and technical school at which the compulsory attendance requirements of this Commonwealth may be met and which meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 et seq.)."Qualified Subchapter S trust." As defined in section 20260HB2632PN3651 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1361(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986."Recipient." An applicant who receives a scholarship."Scholarship." An award under a scholarship program, economically disadvantaged scholarship program or early childhood scholarship program to pay tuition and school-related fees to attend a participating public school, participating nonpublic school or early childhood program."Scholarship granting organization." An eligible nonprofit entity that has been approved by the department to operate a scholarship program, early childhood scholarship program, economically disadvantaged scholarship program or educational improvement program under this article."Scholarship program." A program that provides scholarships to eligible students to attend a participating public school or participating nonpublic school located in this Commonwealth. The term includes a program that has an application and review process for making awards to eligible students and awards scholarships to eligible students without limiting availability to students of one school or one building within a school district or nonpublic school."School." Any of the following that meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964:(1) A public or nonpublic prekindergarten.(2) A public or nonpublic kindergarten, elementary school or secondary school at which the compulsory attendance requirements of this Commonwealth may be met."School age." Children from the earliest admission age to a school's kindergarten program or, if no prekindergarten or kindergarten program is provided, the school's earliest admission age for beginners, until the end of the school year in 20260HB2632PN3651 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which the student attains 21 years of age or graduates from high school, whichever occurs first."School district of residence." The school district in which a student's primary domicile is located."School-related fees." Fees charged by a school to all students for books, instructional materials, technology equipment and services, uniforms, activities and concurrent enrollment programs under Article XVI-B."Secondary school." A school with an eleventh grade."Student." An individual who meets all of the follo wing: (1) Is school age.(2) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(3) Attends or is about to attend a school."Tax Reform Code of 1971." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Tax year." A taxpayer's annual accounting period or, if a return is made for a period of less than 12 months, the period for which the return is made.Section 2003-B.1. Administration and accountability.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall have the following duties:(1) Establish guidelines necessary to implement this article.(2) Establish the process through which and criteria by which an eligible nonprofit entity may apply and receive approval to operate as a scholarship granting organization.(3) Develop guidelines, in consultation with the Department of Education, for the eligibility of an educational improvement program.(4) Establish the process through which an eligible 20260HB2632PN3651 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contributor may apply for a tax credit under section 2005-B.1.(5) By January 1 of each year, publish a list of scholarship granting organizations approved to operate during the following fiscal year.(6) Monitor scholarship granting organizations for compliance with this article and publish compliance information on the department's publicly accessible Internet website in a downloadable spreadsheet format.(7) Publish reports in accordance with section 2013- B.1(e) . (8) No later than November 1, 2028, and each November 1 thereafter, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, publish a list in a downloadable spreadsheet format on the department's publicly accessible Internet website of the contributions of each eligible contributor made under this article by scholarship granting organization and by program category, including scholarship program, economically disadvantaged scholarship program, early childhood scholarship program or educational improvement program, as applicable.(b) Duties of Department of Education.--The Department of Education shall have the following duties:(1) Publish the lists of participating nonpublic schools and participating public schools under section 2011-B.1 on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website in a downloadable spreadsheet format.(2) Annually publish a list of low-achieving schools under section 2010-B.1 on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website in a downloadable 20260HB2632PN3651 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 spreadsheet format.(3) For the purposes of economically disadvantaged scholarship programs, annually determine and publish a list of participating nonpublic schools that meet both of the following criteria:(i) The participating nonpublic school is located in a zip code with a median household income, based on the most recent census data, of less than half the maximum annual household income.(ii) The participating nonpublic school has a tuition rate below the median tuition rate based on data submitted under section 2011-B.1.(c) Duties of Department of Revenue.--The Department of Revenue shall have the following duties:(1) Review applications as provided under section 2005-B.1.(2) No later than November 1, 2028, and each November 1 thereafter , provide the General Assembly with a list of the 10 shareholders, partners or members of pass-through entities with the highest aggregate amount of contributions under this article for the prior fiscal year.(3) By June 30 of each year, provide the General Assembly with a list of the 10 shareholders, partners or members of pass-through entities with the highest aggregate amount of contributions under this article.(d) Duties of Auditor General.--The Auditor General shall have the following duties:(1) Conduct a compliance audit of the affairs and activities of a scholarship granting organization.(2) Conduct a compliance audit of a participating 20260HB2632PN3651 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonpublic school related to the requirements under section 2011-B.1.(3) Publish the audits under paragraphs (1) and (2) on the Auditor General's publicly accessible Internet website.(e) Duties of Independent Fiscal Office.--The Independent Fiscal Office shall have the following duties:(1) Beginning with information reported for the 2027-2028 fiscal year, publish on its publicly accessible Internet website a report of a review of the education options tax credit established under this article every five years.(2) Include all of the following in the report under paragraph (1):(i) The costs of providing the tax credit, including administrative costs to the Commonwealth and lost revenues to the Commonwealth.(ii) An analysis of eligible contributors by contributions made, region and type.(iii) An analysis of scholarship granting organizations by contributions received, region and type of program supported.(iv) An analysis of the data reported under section 2013-B.1.(v) To the extent possible, an analysis of changes in educational outcomes.(vi) Recommendations on how the tax credit could be more efficiently implemented or evaluated.(f) Account.--(1) The Accountability for Diverted Tax Dollars Restricted Account is established as a restricted account in the General Fund.20260HB2632PN3651 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis as follows:(i) 40% to the department to offset costs associated with administering this article.(ii) 20% to the Department of Revenue to offset costs associated with administering this article.(iii) 20% to the Auditor General to offset the costs of conducting audits under subsection (d).(iv) 20% to the Department of Education to offset costs associated with administering this article.(3) The State Treasurer may accept appropriations, transfers, gifts, donations, legacies or other revenues, including allowable Federal funds, for deposit into the account. Interest that accrues in the account shall remain in the account.Section 2004-B.1. Scholarship granting organizations.(a) Requirements.--(1) A scholarship granting organization shall have the following duties:(i) Contribute at least 90% of its annual cash receipts to a scholarship program, early childhood scholarship program, economically disadvantaged scholarship program or educational improvement program, or contribute at least 85% of its annual cash receipts if the scholarship granting organization reports an annual Internal Revenue Service program expense percentage of greater than 90% on the scholarship granting organization's Internal Revenue Service Form 990 filing.(ii) Provide an application and review process for scholarship applicants that includes a means of verifying 20260HB2632PN3651 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 household income, which may include submission of the household members' most recently available Federal or State tax returns, if the household members are required to file the returns.(iii) Refrain from earmarking a contribution by an eligible contributor for a specific student.(iv) Refrain from providing a scholarship to a family member of a person receiving compensation from or involved in the governance of the scholarship granting organization.(v) Refrain from awarding a scholarship to an applicant for enrollment in a home education program under section 1327.1.(vi) Refrain from awarding a scholarship to an applicant to attend a school that is not on the list under section 2011-B.1.(vii) Timely report the information required under section 2013-B.1 to the department.(viii) Remit 2% of its total contributions under this article to the department for deposit into the account.(ix) Maintain separate accounts in its budget to facilitate monitoring and auditing of the use of contributions.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1)(i), a scholar ship granting organization contributes its annual cash receipts to a scholarship program, early childhood scholarship program, economically disadvantaged scholarship program or educational improvement program when the scholarship granting organization expends or otherwise irrevocably encumbers the 20260HB2632PN3651 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 funds for distribution during the then-current fiscal year of the scholarship granting organization or during the next succeeding fiscal year of the scholarship granting organization.(b) Allowable uses for contributions not used to fund scholarships or educational improvement programs.--A scholarship granting organization may use contributions not used to fund scholarships or educational improvement programs for any of the following:(1) Overhead costs directly related to the administration of a scholarship program, early childhood scholarship program, economically disadvantaged scholarship program or educational improvement program, including any of the following:(i) Personnel costs for employees who work regularly in the Commonwealth.(ii) Operational costs for office space located in this Commonwealth.(2) Payment for third-party household income validation related to maximum annual household income requirements.(3) Another use deemed appropriate by the department for the purposes of this article.(c) Noncompliance.--A scholarship granting organization, including its successor organization, that fails to comply with subsection (a) or uses contributions for a purpose not authorized under subsection (b) may not participate in the education options tax credit program for the two fiscal years immediately following the fiscal year in which the scholarship granting organization failed to meet the requirement.Section 2005-B.1. Application by eligible contributors.20260HB2632PN3651 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Application.--(1) An eligible contributor shall apply to the department on a form and in a manner determined by the department for an education options tax credit for contributions to a scholarship granting organization under section 2006-B.1.(2) The department may accept applications for tax credits available during a fiscal year no earlier than July 1 of each fiscal year.(3) At a minimum, the application must include the eligible contributor's name, address, status as a business firm or pass-through entity and contribution amount by program under section 2007-B.1(a).(4) The department shall make tax credits under this article available on a first-come, first-served basis within the limitation specified under section 2007-B.1(a).(5) The department shall maintain a waiting list consisting of each eligible contributor that chooses to be included on the list and whose application has not been conditionally approved because all available tax credits have been awarded.(b) Review.--(1) The department shall provide the Department of Revenue with the list of eligible contributors that submitted an application under subsection (a).(2) The Department of Revenue shall conduct compliance checks on the eligible contributors submitted by the department under paragraph (1) and take the following actions:(i) If the taxpayer is compliant, communicate a 20260HB2632PN3651 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clearance status to the department.(ii) If the taxpayer is not compliant, issue a noncompliance letter to the taxpayer and provide the taxpayer with a reasonable opportunity to resolve the compliance issue.(iii) If the taxpayer does not resolve the compliance issue, communicate a final noncompliance status to the department, and the taxpayer shall be ineligible for the tax credit.(c) Conditional approval.--(1) Subject to the limitations under sections 2006-B.1 and 2007-B.1, upon receipt of a clearance status under subsection (b)(2)(i), the department shall notify the eligible contributor that conditional credits have been reserved and shall inform the eligible contributor of the requirements under subsection (d).(2) Unless otherwise requested by the eligible contributor and agreed to by the eligible contributor and the department, and unless all authorized credits have already been awarded, the department shall give written notice of its conditional approval to each eligible contributor that submitted a completed application under subsection (a) by August 30, or 30 days following receipt of the completed application, whichever is later.(3) If the department fails for a period of at least 10 days to timely transmit a written notice required under this subsection, the affected eligible contributor may bring an action for injunctive or other appropriate relief in Commonwealth Court.(d) Contributions.--To receive a tax credit under this 20260HB2632PN3651 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article, an eligible contributor shall make the contribution to a scholarship granting organization that appears on the list required under section 2003-B.1(a)(5) no later than 60 days after the date of the conditional approval notice received under subsection (c).(e) Proof of contribution.--(1) An eligible contributor shall provide proof of contribution to the department on a form and in a manner determined by the department.(2) If an eligible contributor does not make a minimum of 50% of the full amount of the conditionally approved contribution, the eligible contributor's tax credit application may not be approved in the immediately succeeding fiscal year.(3) Upon receiving satisfactory proof of contribution, the department shall notify the Department of Revenue.(f) Reallocation.--Unawarded tax credits may not be reallocated to any of the categories of programs.(g) Application in the alternative.--At the time of application for a tax credit under this article, the department shall advise an eligible contributor that the eligible contributor may elect that its application for a particular tax credit will, in the alternative, be deemed an application received by the department on the same date as the preferred application, but for a different tax credit authorized under this article if the eligible contributor's preferred choice of tax credit is not available. If an eligible contributor does not receive its preferred choice of tax credit, the department shall promptly consider the eligible contributor's alternative application for a different tax credit authorized under this 20260HB2632PN3651 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article.Section 2006-B.1. Tax credits.(a) Award.--In accordance with section 2007-B.1, th e Department of Revenue shall grant a tax credit against an applicable tax to an eligible contributor for which the Department of Revenue has received notice under section 2005-B.1(e)(3) as follows:(1) The tax credit shall not exceed 75% of the total amount contributed during the tax year by an eligible contributor to a scholarship granting organization for a scholarship program.(2) The tax credit shall not exceed 90% of the total amount contributed during the tax year by an eligible contributor to a scholarship granting organization for an early childhood scholarship program or educational improvement program.(3) The tax credit shall not exceed 99% of the total amount contributed during the tax year by an eligible contributor to a scholarship granting organization for an economically disadvantaged scholarship program.(4) The tax credit shall not exceed $750,000 annually per eligible contributor for contributions made to scholarship granting organizations for scholarship programs, early childhood scholarship programs or educational improvement programs.(5) Subject to section 2007-B.1(a)(4) and (c), no annual limit per eligible contributor shall apply to contributions made to scholarship granting organizations for economically disadvantaged scholarship programs.(b) Combination of tax credits.--In accordance with section 20260HB2632PN3651 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2007-B.1, an eligible contributor may receive tax credits from the Department of Revenue in a tax year for any combination of contributions to scholarship granting organizations. An eligible contributor may not receive tax credits in a tax year in excess of $750,000 for combined contributions to scholarship granting organizations for scholarship programs, early childhood scholarship programs or educational improvement programs.(c) Pass-through entity.--(1) A pass-through entity may elect in writing to distribute for no consideration all or a portion of the credit to shareholders, members or partners in proportion to the percentage interest of the shareholder, member or partner in distributions from the pass-through entity. The shareholders, members or partners may use the credits in the tax year in which the contribution is made or in the tax year immediately following the year in which the contribution is made. The election shall designate the tax year in which the distributed credits are to be used and shall be made according to procedures established by the Department of Revenue. A pass-through entity that received a distribution from a pass-through entity under this paragraph may make a distribution under this paragraph.(2) A pass-through entity and a shareholder, member or partner of a pass-through entity may not claim the credit under this section for the same contribution.(3) A shareholder, member or partner may not carry forward, carry back, obtain a refund of, sell or assign the credit.(4) An individual shareholder, partner or member may apply a credit distributed under this section to income 20260HB2632PN3651 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 taxable under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 to the shareholder, partner or member, to the spouse of the shareholder, partner or member or to both, if both the shareholder, partner or member and the spouse report income on a joint personal income tax return.(d) Restriction.--No credit granted under this section may be applied against a tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 2007-B.1. Limitations.(a) Amount.--The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved for contributions from eligible contributors to scholarship granting organizations shall not exceed $680,000,000 in the 2027-2028 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter. The total aggregate amount shall be allocated as follows:(1) No less than $273,000,000 $375,000,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from eligible contributors to scholarship granting organizations for scholarship programs. (2) No less than $146,500,000 $74,500,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from eligible contributors to scholarship granting organizations for educational improvement programs. (3) No less than $60,500,000 $30,500,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from eligible contributors to scholarship granting organizations for early childhood scholarship programs.(4) No less than $200,000,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from eligible contributors to scholarship granting 20260HB2632PN3651 - 25 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organizations for economically disadvantaged scholarship programs.(b) Activities.--No tax credit may be approved for activi ties that are a part of an eligible contributor's normal course of business.(c) Tax liability.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a tax credit granted for a tax year may not exceed the tax liability of an eligible contributor.(2) In the case of a credit granted to a pass-through entity which elects to distribute the credit under section 2006-B.1(c), a tax credit granted for a tax year and distributed to a shareholder, member or partner may not exceed the tax liability of the shareholder, member or partner.(d) Tax credit use.--A tax credit not used by an eligible contributor in the tax year the contribution was made or in the tax year designated under section 2006-B.1(c) may not be carried forward or carried back and is not refundable or transferable.Section 2008-B.1. Scholarships.(a) Nontaxable income.--A recipient's scholarship shall not be considered taxable income for purposes of Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(b) Financial assistance.--A recipient's scholarship shall not constitute an appropriation or financial assistance to the school or early childhood program attended by the recipient.(c) Amount.--The combined amount of the scholarship awarded to a recipient and additional financial assistance provided to the recipient may not exceed the tuition rate and school-related fees for the participating public school or participating 20260HB2632PN3651 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonpublic school that the recipient attends or will attend.Section 2009-B.1. Educational improvement programs.A scholarship granting organization may provide funds to an educational improvement program that meets the requirements established by the department in consultation with the Department of Education.Section 2010-B.1. Low-achieving schools.(a) List.--By February 1 of each year, the Department of Education shall publish on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website a list of the low-achieving schools for the following school year.(b) Notice.--By February 1 of each year, the Department of Education shall notify each school district identified as having at least one low-achieving school and shall furnish the school district with a list of the low-achieving schools located within the school district.(c) Average daily membership.--(1) A recipient who was enrolled in the recipient's school district of residence or in a charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school when the recipient first received a scholarship under an economically disadvantaged scholarship program shall continue to be counted in the average daily membership of the school district for one year after enrolling in a participating public school or participating nonpublic school.(2) During the year referenced in paragraph (1) and each school year thereafter, a school district of a participating public school in which the recipient is enrolled may not include the recipient in the school district's average daily membership.20260HB2632PN3651 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2011-B.1. School participation in program.(a) Notice.--(1) By November 1 of each year, a school district with a public school that wishes to be a participating public school for the following fiscal year shall notify the Department of Education. The notification must include all of the following:(i) Each school within the school district that the school district intends to make a participating public school.(ii) The amount of tuition and school-related fees attributable to each available seat. The amount under this subparagraph may not exceed the amount calculated under section 2561.(2) By November 1 of each year, a nonpublic school that wishes to be a participating nonpublic school for the following fiscal year shall notify the Department of Education and shall submit to the Department of Education, on a form developed by the Department of Education, all of the following:(i) The amount of tuition and school-related fees attributable to each available seat for the nonpublic school for the current school year.(ii) The complete list of application and admissions requirements used by the nonpublic school to determine whether a student is accepted to enroll in the nonpublic school.(iii) The nonpublic school's institutional financial aid policy.(iv) The nonpublic school's policies regarding the 20260HB2632PN3651 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expulsion and suspension of pupils.(v) The nonpublic school's total enrollment for the previous school year.(vi) The number of students who applied and were not accepted to enroll in the nonpublic school in the previous school year.(vii) The number of students who were unenrolled from the nonpublic school at the initiation of the nonpublic school in the previous school year, not including students who graduated.(b) List.--By January 1 of each year, the Department of Education shall publish on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website the complete list of participating public schools and participating nonpublic schools that provided satisfactory notice and information required under subsection (a). The published list shall be subject to the following:(1) An eligible student may not receive a scholarship to attend a school that is not on the list.(2) The list shall include the information provided by each public school under subsection (a)(1).(3) The list shall include the information provided by each nonpublic school under subsection (a)(2).(4) The list may not include a nonpublic school that discriminates on a basis that is illegal under Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 et seq.).(c) Participating public school criteria.--The following criteria shall apply to a participating public school:(1) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a 20260HB2632PN3651 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school district shall enroll students in a participating public school on a lottery basis from a pool of recipients who meet the application deadline set by the Department of Education until the participating public school fills the school's available seats. The pool may not include a recipient who:(i) Has been expelled or is in the process of being expelled under section 1317.2, 1318 or 1318.1 and applicable regulations of the State Board of Education.(ii) Has been recruited by the school district or its representatives for athletic purposes.(2) Enrollment of recipients may not place the school district in violation of a valid and binding desegregation order.(3) Priority shall be given to:(i) An existing recipient.(ii) A recipient who is a sibling of a student currently enrolled in the school district.(d) Participating nonpublic school criteria.--The following criteria shall apply to a participating nonpublic school:(1) The participating nonpublic school may not discriminate on a basis which is illegal under Federal or State laws applicable to nonpublic schools.(2) The participating nonpublic school shall comply with section 1521.(3) The participating nonpublic school or its representatives may not recruit a student for athletic purposes.(e) Student rules, policies and procedures.--(1) Prior to enrollment of a recipient, a school 20260HB2632PN3651 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district of a participating public school or a participating nonpublic school shall inform the recipient's parent of the rules, policies and procedures of the participating public school or participating nonpublic school, including academic policies, disciplinary rules and administrative procedures of the participating public school or participating nonpublic school.(2) Enrollment of a recipient in a participating public school or participating nonpublic school shall constitute acceptance of the rules, policies and procedures of the participating public school or participating nonpublic school.(f) Transportation.--(1) Transportation of recipients shall be provided to the extent required under section 1361.(2) Reimbursement shall be as follows:(i) Transportation of a recipient attending a participating public school shall be subject to reimbursement under section 2541.(ii) Transportation of a recipient attending a participating nonpublic school shall be subject to reimbursement under sections 2509.3 and 2541.(g) Institutional financial aid.--A participating nonpublic school may not use a recipient's scholarship award to reduce or supplant the amount of institutional financial aid provided by the participating nonpublic school, except if the recipient's scholarship award exceeds the recipient's total cost of tuition and school-related fees.(h) Tuition rates.--(1) A school district of a participating public school 20260HB2632PN3651 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may not charge a recipient a higher tuition rate or school-related fee than the school district would have charged to a similarly situated student who is not receiving a scholarship.(2) Notwithstanding section 2561, a school district of a participating public school may charge a recipient a tuition rate that is lower than that charged to a student who is not receiving a scholarship.(3) A participating nonpublic school may not charge a recipient a higher tuition rate or school-related fee than the participating nonpublic school would have charged to a similarly situated student who is not receiving a scholarship.(i) Construction.--Nothing in this article shall be construed to:(1) Prohibit a participating nonpublic school from limiting admission to a particular grade level, a single gender or areas of concentration of the participating nonpublic school, including mathematics, science and the arts.(2) Authorize the Commonwealth or an agency, officer or political subdivision of the Commonwealth to impose an additional requirement on a participating nonpublic school that is not otherwise authorized under this article or other laws of this Commonwealth or to require a participating nonpublic school to enroll a recipient if the participating nonpublic school does not offer appropriate programs, is not structured or equipped with the necessary facilities to meet the recipient's special needs or does not offer a particular program requested.20260HB2632PN3651 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2012-B.1. Original jurisdiction.The Pennsylvania Supreme Court shall have exclusive and original jurisdiction to hear a challenge or to render a declaratory judgment concerning the constitutionality of this article. The Pennsylvania Supreme Court may take an action the court deems appropriate, consistent with the Pennsylvania Supreme Court's retaining jurisdiction over the matter, to find facts or to expedite a final judgment in connection with a challenge or request for declaratory relief.Section 2013-B.1. Reporting.(a) Programs providing scholarships .-- Each scholarship granting organization that operates a scholarship program, economically disadvantaged scholarship program or early childhood scholarship program shall annually report to the department, by scholarship program, economically disadvantaged scholarship program and early childhood scholarship program, all of the following information based on the immediately preceding fiscal year by October 1 of each year:(1) The number of scholarships awarded to applicants with a household income that does not exceed 50% of the maximum annual household income, disaggregated by program category.(2) The number of scholarships awarded to applicants with a household income that is greater than 50% but does not exceed 75% of the maximum annual household income, disaggregated by program category.(3) The number of scholarships awarded to applicants with a household income that is greater than 75% but does not exceed 100% of the maximum annual household income, disaggregated by program category.20260HB2632PN3651 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The total amount of contributions received from eligible contributors granted a tax credit under this article during the immediately preceding fiscal year.(5) For each scholarship awarded to an applicant:(i) An indicator of whether the recipient was an eligible early childhood student, eligible student or eligible student with a disability.(ii) An indicator of whether the recipient was in an early childhood program, in grades kindergarten through eight or in grades nine through 12.(iii) The dollar amount of the scholarship award.(iv) The dollar amount of tuition and school-related fees paid by the student after the scholarship award was applied.(v) The year in which the scholarship award was used.(vi) The name of the recipient's school district of residence.(vii) The name of the school or early childhood program that the recipient attended.(b) Educational improvement programs.--Each scholarship granting organization that operates an educational improvement program shall annually report the following information based on the immediately preceding fiscal year to the department by October 1 of each year:(1) The total amount of contributions received from eligible contributors granted a tax credit under this article during the immediately preceding fiscal year.(2) A description of each educational improvement program supported by the scholarship granting organization.20260HB2632PN3651 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The amount distributed to each educational improvement program supported by the scholarship granting organization.(c) Scholarship granting organizations.--Each scholarship granting organization shall annually report to the department, based on the immediately preceding fiscal year, the use of contributions not used to fund scholarships or educational improvement programs, disaggregated by eligible use under section 2004-B.1(b). The department may request supporting documentation.(d) Forms.--The information required under subsections (a), (b) and (c) shall be submitted on a form provided by the department. No later than August 1 of each year, the department shall distribute the forms to each scholarship granting organization required to make a report under this section.(e) Publication.--Beginning November 1, 2028, and each year thereafter, the department shall annually publish a downloadable spreadsheet on the department's publicly accessible Internet website containing the information required under subsections (a), (b) and (c). To protect student privacy and prevent the identification of students, the department may not disclose the names of scholarship award recipients.Section 4. The transition from Article XX-B of the act to Article XX-B.1 of the act shall be as follows:(1) Article XX-B of the act shall continue to apply to a tax credit approved for a fiscal year prior to the 2027-2028 fiscal year, a contribution made under an approval issued for a fiscal year prior to the 2027-2028 fiscal year, a report required for a fiscal year prior to the 2027-2028 fiscal year and an administrative, enforcement, tax or reporting matter 20260HB2632PN3651 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 arising from a tax credit or contribution under Article XX-B of the act.(2) The addition of Article XX-B.1 of the act shall apply to tax credits approved for the 2027-2028 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2632PN3651 - 36 - 123456